District of Columbia statutes.
29-312.05

Effect of dissolution.

(a)

A dissolved corporation continues its corporate existence but shall not carry on any activities except that appropriate to wind up and liquidate its business and affairs, including:

(1)

Collecting its assets;

(2)

Disposing of its properties that will not be distributed in kind to its shareholders;

(3)

Discharging or making provision for discharging its liabilities;

(4)

Distributing its remaining property among its shareholders according to their interests; and

(5)

Doing every other act necessary to wind up and liquidate its activities and affairs.

(1)

Transfer title to the corporation’s property;

(2)

Prevent transfer of its shares or securities, although the authorization to dissolve may provide for closing the corporation’s share transfer records;

(3)

Subject its directors or officers to standards of conduct different from those prescribed in subchapter VI of this chapter;

(4)

Change:

(A)

Quorum or voting requirements for its board of directors or shareholders;

(B)

Provisions for selection, resignation, or removal of its directors or officers, or both;

(C)

Provisions for amending its bylaws;

(5)

Prevent commencement of a proceeding by or against the corporation in its corporate name;

(6)

Abate or suspend a proceeding pending by or against the corporation on the effective date of dissolution; or

(7)

Terminate the authority of the registered agent of the corporation.

(b)

Dissolution of a corporation shall not:

History

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
Mar. 5, 2013, D.C. Law 19-210, § 2(c)(29), 59 DCR 13171

Section References

This section is referenced in § 29-312.23 and § 29-312.24.

Effect of Amendments

The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-210 substituted “activities” for “business” twice in (a).

Editor's Notes

Application of Law 19-210: Section 7 of D.C. Law 19-210 provided that the act shall apply as of January 1, 2012.